Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-407
Marriages; record of county judge; legal and competent evidence.

The record of Indian marriages made by the county judge pursuant to Laws 1913, Chapter 68, section 7, and certified copies thereof, shall be legal and competent evidence in all proceedings of the facts therein authorized to be stated.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 7, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 1613;

C.S.1922, § 1562;

C.S.1929, § 42-407;

R.S.1943, § 42-407.